Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Operation of Locks

146.180.
Lock fee.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet may assess a fee for the use of any lock on a navigable waterway operated by the Commonwealth and formerly under jurisdiction of the United States Army Corps of Engineers and pursuant to completion of negotiations authorized by KRS 151.580.

The fee shall not exceed five dollars ($5) each time the lock gates are used regardless of the number of craft passing through said lock.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 325, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 121, effective July 15, 2010.

146.185.
Use of lock without payment of fee prohibited — Dates of lock operations — Remittance of fees collected.

No person shall attempt to utilize any lock on a navigable waterway operated by the Commonwealth without payment of the fee prescribed by KRS 146.180(2). At the time any person attempts to utilize the lock, the fee must be paid to the lockmaster or the employee who provides the service of opening the lock.

The months, days and hours of lock operation shall be prescribed by the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

Each Monday following a period of lock operation, those individuals responsible for collection of fees shall remit all moneys collected to the cabinet in a manner prescribed by the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 325, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 122, effective July 15, 2010.